Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-124] Board of education; organization;
quorum; meetings. (a) The governor shall select a chairperson of the
board; provided that the chairperson shall be selected from among the at-large
members. The board shall select a vice chairperson from among its members, and
the vice chairperson shall serve as interim chairperson in the event the
chairperson's seat becomes vacant.

(b) A majority of all the voting members to
which the board is entitled shall constitute a quorum to conduct business. At
any time the board has fewer than five voting members, three voting members of
the board shall constitute a quorum to conduct business and the concurrence of
at least three voting members shall be necessary to make any action of the
board valid.

(c) Notwithstanding chapter 92, from the
convening of the legislature in regular session to adjournment sine die of each
regular session, and during each special session of the legislature, the board
may file any notice that specifies only legislation or legislation-related
agenda items, no fewer than two calendar days before the meeting. [L 2011, c 5,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next